Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 11 Identification of Vehicles and Prevention of Theft

Cross references. —

As to larceny and related offenses, see §

6-3-401

et seq.

As to unauthorized use of state or county vehicle, see § 9-2-1016(j).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 410 to 419.

Garage keeper's liability for theft or unauthorized use of car, 43 ALR2d 403.

Validity of National Motor Vehicle Theft Act (18 U.S.C. §§ 2311 to 2313), 56 ALR2d 1309, 15 ALR Fed 856, 15 ALR Fed 888, 15 ALR Fed 919, 45 ALR Fed 370, 67 ALR Fed 572.

Liability for loss of or damage to automobile left in parking lot or garage, 7 ALR3d 927, 13 ALR4th 362, 13 ALR4th 442.

Asportation of motor vehicle as necessary element to support charge of larceny, 70 ALR3d 1202.

Requirement as to interstate character of offense under provision of National Motor Vehicle Theft Act (18 U.S.C. § 2313) making it offense to receive, conceal, store, barter, sell or dispose of stolen motor vehicle moving as or which is part of or constitutes interstate commerce, 15 ALR Fed 888.

What constitutes “motor vehicle” within meaning of National Motor Vehicle Theft Act (18 U.S.C. §§ 2311 to 2313), 15 ALR Fed 919.

61A C.J.S. Motor Vehicles §§ 1511 to 1540.

§ 31-11-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Calendar year” means the twelve (12) calendar months beginning January 1 and ending December 31;

“Dealer” means all persons engaged in the business or vocation of manufacturing, buying, selling, trading, dealing, destroying, disposing of, storing or salvaging vehicles, or secondhand or used vehicle parts, equipment, attachments, accessories or appurtenances common to or a part of vehicles;

“Department” means the Wyoming department of transportation;

“Driver” means the person operating, driving or in control of a vehicle;

“Officer” means any duly constituted peace officer of this state, or of any town, city or county in this state;

“Owner” means as provided by W.S. 31-5-102(a)(xxvi);

“Public highway” means any public street, thoroughfare, roadway, alley, lane or bridge in any county, town or city in the state;

“Vehicle” means as defined by W.S. 31-5-102(a)(lviii) except bicycles;

“Vehicle identification number” means any identifying number, serial number, engine number if the model year is prior to 1956 or other distinguishing number or mark, including letters, if any, placed on a vehicle or vehicle component by its manufacturer or by authority of the department;

“This act” means W.S.

31-11-101

through

31-11-111

.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 88, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 72-401; C.S. 1945, § 60-1401; W.S. 1957, § 31-316; Laws 1979, ch. 152, § 2; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1985, ch. 183, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 31-11-102.
Unauthorized use of vehicle; penalty.

Any person who without specific authority of the owner or his authorized and accredited agent willfully, wantonly, or maliciously takes possession of, or drives, propels or takes away, or attempts to take possession of, drive, propel, or take away a vehicle, the property of another, for the purpose of temporarily making use of the vehicle, or who knowingly aids, abets or assists another in so doing, upon conviction, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 88, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 72-402; C.S. 1945, § 60-1402; W.S. 1957, § 31-317; Laws 1983, ch. 171, § 4; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1985, ch. 183, § 1.

There is no specific intent required in this section.

Matlack v. State, 695 P.2d 635,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 448

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 472 U.S. 1030, 105 S. Ct. 3508, 87 L. Ed. 2d 638, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 2327 (U.S. 1985).

Joyriding is not a proper defense

to a charge of concealing stolen property. DeLeon v. State, 896 P.2d 764,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1995).

Instruction upheld. —

In a prosecution for burglary based on defendant's entering and driving a vehicle without permission, the trial court did not err in refusing to give defendant's proposed instruction defining the crime of unauthorized use of a vehicle. Brett v. State, 961 P.2d 385,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1998).

Relation to felony larceny. —

Sufficient evidence supported a conviction for felony larceny because there was an intent to permanently deprive where defendant kept a vehicle for 3 months, lied about the owner of the truck, and made no effort to return the truck to the owner or advise him of its location. Defendant argued that his actions constituted joyriding or unauthorized use. Peña v. State, 2013 WY 4, 294 P.3d 13,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2013).

Applied

in

Reinholt v. State, 601 P.2d 1311,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 478

(Wyo. 1979).

Quoted

in

Engle v. State, 774 P.2d 1303,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1989); Lance Oil & Gas Co. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2004 WY 156, 101 P.3d 899,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(2004).

Cited

in

Buck v. State, 603 P.2d 878,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 494

(Wyo. 1979); Martinez v. State, 611 P.2d 831,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 274

(Wyo. 1980); Reynoldson v. State, 737 P.2d 1331,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 456

(Wyo. 1987); Simonds v. State, 762 P.2d 1189,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1988).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Elements of offense defined in “joyriding” statutes, 9 ALR3d 633.

Nature and extent of insured's duty to seek retrieval of stolen automobile, 9 ALR4th 405.

What constitutes theft within automobile theft insurance policy — modern cases, 67 ALR4th 82.

Liability for personal injury or property damage caused by unauthorized use of automobile which had been parked with keys removed from ignition, 70 ALR4th 276.

Joyriding or similar charge as lesser-included offense of larceny or similar charge, 78 ALR5th 567.

What constitutes concealing stolen motor vehicle within meaning of 18 USC § 2313, 67 ALR Fed 572.

Validity, Construction, and Application of Anti-Car Theft A (18 USCS § 2119), 140 ALR Fed 249.

§ 31-11-103.
Alteration of vehicle identification numbers; penalty.

No person shall:

Remove, change, alter or obliterate the vehicle identification number of a vehicle with intent to defraud by altering or disguising the identity of a vehicle; or

Possess a vehicle or vehicle component with knowledge that it has a vehicle identification number which has been removed, changed, altered or obliterated in violation of paragraph (i) of this subsection.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 88, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 72-403; C.S. 1945, § 60-1403; W.S. 1957, § 31-318; Laws 1979, ch. 152, § 2; 1983, ch. 171, § 3; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1985, ch. 183, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

107 ALR5th 567.

§ 31-11-104.
Sale of seized vehicles; disposition of proceeds; proof of ownership after sale.

All vehicles seized under W.S.

31-11-111

remaining unclaimed after ninety (90) days from the date of seizure, shall be sold by the department or its authorized representative, at public auction, to the highest bidder. Notice of sale shall be published not less than ten (10) days preceding the date of the sale, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the vehicle is to be sold, giving a full description of the vehicle together with engine or serial numbers or marks, if any. All expenses incident to the sale and storage of the vehicle shall be first paid from the receipts from the sale, and any residue shall be paid by the department to the state treasurer for credit to the general fund. Should any claimant prove ownership of a vehicle sold by the department under this act within six (6) months after the date of sale, the state auditor shall upon proper proof of ownership approved by the department, draw a warrant upon the state treasurer in favor of the claimant for the amount which was paid into the state treasury.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 88, § 15; R.S. 1931, § 72-413; C.S. 1945, § 60-1410; Laws 1949, ch. 151, § 36; W.S. 1957, § 31-323; W.S. 1977, §

31-11-107

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1985, ch. 183, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to publication of legal notices, see §

1-6-201

et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in the last sentence, see § 31-11-101(a)(x).

§ 31-11-105.
Special vehicle identification number.

An owner of a vehicle that does not have a vehicle identification number present or an owner of a vehicle for which a Wyoming certificate of title has been issued or is required who replaces any part of the vehicle on which the vehicle identification number appears or who incorporates a part containing the vehicle identification number into another vehicle, shall apply to the department forthwith for a special vehicle identification number. The department shall determine that the applicant for the special vehicle identification number is the lawful owner of the vehicle. An application blank shall be furnished by the department for the registration of the special vehicle identification number containing a complete description of the vehicle, the name and address of the owner, from whom purchased and other information as required by the department. The owner shall pay a registration fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) for the special vehicle identification number.

In designating special vehicle identification numbers for vehicles the department shall assign the numbers consecutively, beginning with the number five hundred one (501), preceded by the letter “S” and followed by the letter “W” in the order of the filing of applications for special vehicle identification numbers. The department shall not register or reregister any vehicle with a defective vehicle identification number.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 88, § 12; R.S. 1931, § 72-411; C.S. 1945, § 60-1408; Laws 1949, ch. 151, § 35; W.S. 1957, § 31-324; W.S. 1977, §

31-11-108

; Laws 1979, ch. 152, §§ 2, 3; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1985, ch. 183, § 1; 2009, ch. 46, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), inserted “a vehicle that does not have a vehicle identification number present or an owner of” and “or is required,” and substituted “twenty dollars ($20.00)” for “one dollar ($1.00)” in the last sentence.

Cross references. —

As to obtaining vehicle identification number where vehicle to be titled has no number, see § 31-2-103(c).

§ 31-11-106.
General penalties.

Any person violating any provision of this act unless otherwise specifically provided for in this act, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 88, § 13; R.S. 1931, § 72-412; C.S. 1945, § 60-1409; W.S. 1957, § 31-325; W.S. 1977, §

31-11-109

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1985, ch. 183, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in this section, see § 31-11-101(a)(x).

Severability. —

Laws 1923, ch. 88, § 16, reads: “If any section, subsection, sentence, clause or phrase of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, such decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this act. The state legislature hereby declares that it would have passed this act, and each section, subsection, sentence, clause and phrase thereof irrespective of the fact that any one or more sections, subsections, sentences, clauses or phrases be declared unconstitutional.”

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1923, ch. 88, § 17, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

§ 31-11-107.
Daily records of vehicle dealers; penalties for violations.

Every dealer shall keep and maintain in his place of business, a permanent legibly written daily record of all vehicles and vehicle components which carry a vehicle identification number coming into his possession except those vehicles received by him for the express purpose of repairs that do not require the replacement of any component that bears a vehicle identification number. The record shall include the name and address of the owner or vendor, the date of the transactions, the model year, make and style, vehicle identification number, the state registration license number and the purpose and disposition of the vehicle or component. The record is to be open at all times to the inspection by the department or any peace officer and available for use as evidence. Daily records may be destroyed after retention for three (3) years.

Every person offering or delivering to a dealer for resale or consignment any vehicle or vehicle component which carries a vehicle identification number shall register his name, address and the name and address of the owner in the record kept by the dealer. The driver, on request or demand of the dealer or his agent, shall produce for examination the vehicle state registration license certificate issued to the driver or to the owner of the vehicle.

Any person knowingly violating any provision of this section shall be punished by a fine not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), by imprisonment not to exceed six (6) months, or both.

Any person knowingly and with intent to defraud violating any provision of this section shall be punished by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), by imprisonment not to exceed five (5) years, or both.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 152, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-11-110

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1985, ch. 183, § 1.

Cited

in

State ex rel. DOT v. Legarda, 2003 WY 130, 77 P.3d 708,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 31-11-108.
Examination of vehicle identification numbers; notification where number altered; penalties for violations.

Every dealer shall examine, without charge, the vehicle identification number of every vehicle coming into his possession except those vehicles received by him for the express purpose of repairs that do not require the replacement of any component that bears a vehicle identification number. The dealer is not required to examine the vehicle identification number of the same vehicle more than once in the same calendar year when the dealer knows that the person in possession of the vehicle is the lawful owner. The dealer shall promptly notify the local sheriff’s office if the vehicle identification number of the vehicle has been altered, changed or obliterated as to make the number indecipherable or if the vehicle identification number or the state registration license number of the vehicle does not correspond with the vehicle identification number of the vehicle state registration certificate.

Any person knowingly violating this section shall be punished by a fine not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six (6) months, or both.

Any person knowingly and with intent to defraud violating this section shall be punished by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), by imprisonment not to exceed five (5) years, or both.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 152, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-11-111

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1985, ch. 183, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

§ 31-11-109.
Report of stored or parked vehicles; offenses and penalties.

Whenever any vehicle has been stored, parked or left in a garage, or any type of storage or parking lot for more than thirty (30) days, the owner of the garage or lot shall report the make, engine number, vehicle identification number and serial number of the vehicle in writing to the sheriff of the county in which the garage or lot is located.

Nothing in this section applies where:

Arrangements have been made for continuous storage or parking by the owner of the vehicle parked or stored;

Arrangements for towing or storage have been made by a law enforcement agency; or

The owner of the vehicle is personally known to the owner or operator of the garage or lot.

Any person who fails to submit the report required under this section at the end of thirty (30) days shall forfeit all claims for storage of the vehicles.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 152, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-11-112; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1985, ch. 183, § 1.

§ 31-11-110.
Surrender and cancellation of certificate of title; penalties for violations.

The owner of any vehicle for which a Wyoming certificate of title has been issued, upon the destruction or dismantling of the vehicle or upon its being changed in such a manner that it is no longer a vehicle, or upon its being sold or otherwise disposed of as salvage, shall surrender his certificate of title to the department and take a receipt therefor. Upon the owner’s procuring the consent of the holders of any security interest noted on the certificate of title and shown to be unreleased, the certificate may be cancelled.

Any person who knowingly violates this section shall be punished by a fine not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), by imprisonment not to exceed six (6) months, or both.

Any person who, with intent to defraud, violates this section shall be punished by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), by imprisonment not to exceed five (5) years, or both.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 152, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-11-113; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1985, ch. 183, § 1.

§ 31-11-111.
Seizure of vehicles by officers.

All officers, having probable cause, may take and hold possession of any vehicle for a reasonable time not to exceed ninety (90) days as may be necessary if the vehicle identification number of the vehicle has been altered, removed, changed or obliterated. Any officer taking possession of a vehicle shall immediately notify the local sheriff’s office and the rightful owner, if known. The notification shall contain a description of the vehicle and any other facts that may assist in locating the rightful owner or in prosecuting any person for a violation of law.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 152, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-11-114; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1985, ch. 183, § 1.